Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-128.01
Reconstructed, defined.

Reconstructed means the designation of a vehicle which was permanently altered from its original design construction by removing, adding, or substituting major component parts.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 16.